Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 1. Provisions Common to Drainage Districts.
§ 51-33-67.
Procedure to release lands from bondholders.

Any landowner desiring to take advantage of Sections 51-33-65 and 51-33-67 shall first make application to the drainage commissioners of the drainage district in which his land is located, and it shall thereupon be the duty of the drainage commissioners of such drainage district to enter such application on the minutes of such drainage district and to apply to the owners of all outstanding bonds of such drainage district to determine the amount required to be paid for the release of such lands from the lien of said assessment of benefits thereon. After the amount required to be paid for the release of such lands from the lien of said assessment of benefits shall have been determined and agreed upon by the commissioners and the owners of all outstanding bonds, the commissioners, with the approval of the chancery court or other court in which the affairs of the drainage district are being administered, or with the approval of the chancellor in vacation, shall be authorized to accept the amount thus agreed upon in full satisfaction and settlement of the lien of said assessment of benefits on said land, and to execute and deliver to the landowner a release and quitclaim deed releasing the land from the lien of the assessment of benefits of such drainage district upon payment by the landowner of the amount agreed upon, which amount shall be deposited in the bond and interest fund of such drainage district. The written consent of all owners of the outstanding bonds of such drainage district, together with the order of the board of commissioners authorizing the execution and delivery of the release and quitclaim deed for and on behalf of the drainage district, shall be spread upon the minutes of such drainage district. Nothing herein shall have the effect of releasing any land situated in a drainage district from its liability for annual maintenance taxes as now or which may hereafter be levied.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4660-02; Laws, 1944, ch. 302, § 2.

§ 51-33-69.
Release of lands in districts with more than fifty per cent of lands forfeited to state for taxes.

In any drainage district in the State of Mississippi in which more than fifty per cent of the land in such drainage district has prior to March 31, 1944, been forfeited to the state for taxes, the title thereto has matured in the state, and title to which is on said date in the State of Mississippi, and which has an outstanding bonded indebtedness, any landowner may secure the release of his lands, or any part thereof, from the lien of the assessment of benefits thereon for drainage purposes by paying to the drainage commissioners, either in cash, bonds, or interest coupons of such drainage district, or by credit on judgments rendered against the district for bonds and interest coupons, such an amount as may be determined as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4660-10; Laws, 1944, ch. 303, § 1.

§ 51-33-71.
Procedure to release lands in districts with more than fifty percent tax-forfeited lands.

Any landowner desiring to take advantage of Sections 51-33-69 through 51-33-73 shall first make application to the drainage commissioners of the district in which his land is located, giving the description of the land sought to be released and whether he desires to pay for the release of such land in cash, or with bonds or coupons, or by credit on judgment rendered against the district for bonds and interest coupons. It shall thereupon be the duty of the drainage commissioners of such district to enter such application upon the minutes of the district and determine and enter upon such minutes the amount which the drainage commissioners find to be a reasonable cash value for the release of such lands. They shall advise such landowner of their action and, if such landowner shall agree in writing to pay such amount, the drainage commissioners shall thereupon notify by registered mail the bondholders of the district, or so many of them as they may be able to ascertain the address of, of such application and request the approval of such bondholders of the release of such land. If the holders of as much as seventy-five per cent of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district, including bonds and coupons for which judgment has been rendered against the district but not including bonds or coupons which have become barred by the statutes of limitation, approve such release in writing, the drainage commissioners shall file a petition in the chancery court of the county in which the affairs of the district are being administered, requesting the approval of said court or the chancellor in vacation of the release of such land. They shall state in such petition the description of the land sought to be released, the price to be paid for such release, how such payment is to be made, and the name and address of all known bondholders. There shall be attached to such petition the written approval of such of the bondholders as have approved the release of such land. Upon the filing of such petition the clerk of said court shall fix a day for the hearing thereof, not less than ten days nor more than two weeks from the date of the filing of such petition, and shall cause not less than seven days notice of such hearing to be given by publication in at least one issue of a public newspaper published in the county in which such petition is filed, a copy of which notice shall be mailed by the clerk to each of the known bondholders at the address stated in the petition. The notice so published and mailed shall state the number of acres of land sought to be released, the name of the owner thereof, and the amount to be paid for the release, and shall advise that the matter will be heard at the time and place fixed. Upon the hearing of such petition all bondholders and landowners of the district shall have the right to appear and object, and if the court or the chancellor in vacation be satisfied that the amount which the commissioners have found to be the reasonable cash value for the release of such land is the reasonable cash value thereof and that it would be to the best interest of all bondholders and all others interested that the property be so released, the court or the chancellor in vacation shall enter a decree approving the release of such land; and the drainage commissioners shall be authorized to accept the amount in full settlement and satisfaction of the lien of said assessment of benefits on said land. Upon such amount being paid by such landowners to the drainage commissioners, such land shall be released from such assessment of benefits by proper order spread upon the minutes of such drainage district, and the president and secretary of the board of drainage commissioners of the district shall execute and deliver to the landowner a proper release of said land. Nothing herein shall have the effect of releasing any land situated in a drainage district from its liability for annual maintenance taxes as now or which may hereafter be provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4660-11; Laws, 1944, ch. 303, § 2.

§ 51-33-73.
Payment for release.

The amount required to be paid to obtain the release provided for in Sections 51-33-69 through 51-33-73 may be paid in cash, bonds, interest coupons of such drainage district, or by credit on any judgment rendered against the district on defaulted bonds and coupons; however, the same shall not be paid by any bonds or interest coupons which have become barred by the statutes of limitation of the State of Mississippi. If the amount paid be in cash, the drainage commissioners shall deposit the same in a special fund to be used in paying the bonded indebtedness of the district; but if the release be paid for in bonds or coupons or by credit on judgment against the district, the same shall immediately be cancelled by the drainage commissioners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4660-12; Laws, 1944, ch. 303, § 3.

§ 51-33-75.
Receivership for certain districts.

Whenever any drainage district organized under the laws of this state shall cease to function in the manner provided by law for a period of two or more years by failing to levy and collect the annual assessments made and pledged by it to the payment of its bonded indebtedness, or by failing to function as an organized body, or shall suffer its bonded indebtedness or a substantial part thereof to be in default and so remain for a period of two or more years, then, in either or all of such events, any holder of any of the outstanding and past due bonds issued by said drainage district or of judgments based upon said bonded indebtedness shall have the right to petition the chancery court of the county in which said drainage district or the greater part thereof is situated, for the appointment of a receiver for said drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4671-01; Laws, 1952, ch. 308, § 1.

§ 51-33-77.
Proceedings for appointment of receiver.

Upon the filing of petition, process may be had on all interested persons by publication of summons as provided by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure directed to the landowners, bondholders, and creditors of said drainage district commanding them to appear before the chancery court at a place named within such chancery court district on a day certain in termtime or before the chancellor in vacation and show cause, if any they can, why a receiver shall not be appointed for said drainage district. Upon the hearing of said petition, if it shall be proven that any or all of said allegations as set forth herein and alleged in said petition are true, the court shall appoint the State Auditor of Public Accounts as receiver for said drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4671-02; Laws, 1952, ch. 308, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 113, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 51-33-79.
Duties of receiver; oath; bond; records.

The bond of the state auditor of public accounts, as said auditor, is hereby fixed to be the bond of said state auditor of public accounts as receiver hereunder; and the oath of office taken by said state auditor of public accounts shall be sufficient oath to be required as receiver hereunder. It is hereby fixed to be the duty of the state auditor of public accounts to serve and qualify as receiver under Sections 51-33-75 through 51-33-89, and upon being appointed hereunder he shall discharge all the duties heretofore required of the drainage commissioner, other duties prescribed by said sections, and orders of the court; and he shall be subject to the orders of the court. The tenure of office of the drainage commissioners shall thereupon terminate during the pendency of said receivership, and the court shall order all the records of said drainage district to be turned over to said receiver who may take possession thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4671-03; Laws, 1952, ch. 308, § 3.

§ 51-33-81.
Audit of records.

It shall be the duty of the receiver to audit the records of said drainage district so as to show (1) each tract of land originally assessed described with reasonable certainty, (2) the name of the person designated as owner on the original benefit assessment roll, (3) the total amount originally assessed against each tract of land, (4) the total amount of assessed benefits actually paid on each tract of land, (5) the total amount of assessed benefits on each tract of land remaining unpaid and due when the audit is made, and (6) the total amount of unpaid assessments of each tract remaining unpaid but not due. In the event the records of said drainage district have been lost or cannot be found upon diligent search and inquiry, said receiver shall make an audit as best he can, showing the six items above enumerated by taking into consideration the last time annual levy was made as reflected by the order of court, board of supervisors, or other governing authority, and the amount of outstanding and unpaid bonds and interest coupons issued by said drainage district as may be satisfactorily proved to him by the holders of any such bonds, whether said bonds are in their original form or have been reduced to judgment. Said audit shall also show whether or not the bonds issued by said drainage district are in excess of the assessed benefits or other limitations fixed by law at the time such bonds were issued and, if excessive, to what extent. Upon such audit being completed, the receiver shall file the same, together with such supplemental report as he may deem proper or the court may require, and said audit shall be deemed prima facie correct. Upon filing such audit and report, the clerk of said court shall cause to be published once each week for three successive weeks in a newspaper published in said county, or if no newspaper is published in said county, then in some newspaper having a general circulation in said county, a notice and summons directed to all landowners of said drainage district, the holders of its bonds, and judgment holders, that such audit and report of the receiver has been filed in said court and receivership cause and is subject to their inspection and objection. Such notice shall state that unless such landowner, bondholders, or judgment holders shall, on or before the next ensuing term of said court to convene not earlier than thirty days after the first publication, appear and show cause in writing and in detail why said audit is incorrect in any particular, then said audit will be approved and made final, and all parties shall be bound thereby. It shall be the duty of the court to hear and adjudicate all objections made and filed by any landowner or any bondholder, giving to each the right to contest the objection of the other. After all objections have been heard and adjudicated, the court shall enter its final decree, which shall describe with reasonable certainty each tract of land assessed, the name of the owner or the one to whom it was originally assessed, the amount of unpaid benefit assessments which are due and chargeable to each tract, the amount of unpaid benefit assessments which are not due, the names of the bond and judgment holders and the amounts held by each which are found to be legal obligations of said drainage district, and which of such bonds or the percentage thereof are entitled to payment out of the remaining unpaid benefit assessments when collected. Said final decree shall also declare and fix as a statutory lien, paramount to all liens save and except liens for state and county taxes, the amount so found to be owing and unpaid, whether due or not, on each tract of land and shall fix a day, not later than four months after the rendition of said final decree, for the payment of all such unpaid benefit assessments as are found to be then due and owing. Said decree shall also provide for a sale by the receiver of any and all tracts of land therein mentioned on which the amount so assessed and fixed as a lien is due and shall remain unpaid on the day fixed for its payment. Publication of notice of such sale shall be made in manner and form and for the time required by law for the sale of land delinquent for general taxes, such sale to take place at the court house of said county within legal hours on the day named in the published notice of sale. The court may from time to time order further sales of any such land for the remaining assessed benefits which shall later mature. From such final decree any interested landowner and bondholder may appeal to the supreme court in the manner provided by law generally for such appeals.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4671-04; Laws, 1952, ch. 308, § 4.

§ 51-33-83.
Payment of assessments by landowners or sale of property.

Any landowner interested shall have the right to pay to the receiver, whether due or not, the amount charged and assessed as a lien on his tract of land at any time before it is sold. In such event the receiver shall issue to him a receipt therefor, which shall discharge such tract of land from the lien and assessment fixed against it and may be recorded by the clerk of said court. In the event of a sale the landowner, the bond and judgment holders, or their agent shall have the right to purchase, and sale shall be made to the highest bidder for cash at public outcry. The receiver shall execute to the purchaser an appropriate conveyance of the tract sold for the amount bid, and such sale shall extinguish all claims and demands of the bond and judgment holders against said land for the benefit assessments for which it is sold, whether for the full amount or not, but shall not affect the lien of the bond and judgment holders for any benefit assessments not due.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4671-05; Laws, 1952, ch. 308, § 5.

§ 51-33-85.
Compromise of assessments between landowners and bondholders.

It shall be permissible for the landowner and the bond and judgment holders of such bonds as may be adjudicated a lien on unpaid assessed benefits to agree, in writing signed by them and filed with the receiver, to compromise and settle the amount assessed and fixed as a lien on any particular tract of land for such sum as they may agree on. In such event the receiver shall, upon the landowner paying to him the agreed sum, issue to the landowner a receipt for the amount so agreed in full satisfaction of such lien; and such receipt may be recorded by the chancery clerk when signed and acknowledged by the receiver. The bond and judgment holders of such bonds as may be adjudicated a lien on unpaid assessed benefits may act by a common agency appointed by them for this purpose, which appointment shall be in writing and duly acknowledged and recorded in the land deed records of such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4671-06; Laws, 1952, ch. 308, § 6.

§ 51-33-87.
Disposition of funds and discharge of receiver.

All funds received by the receiver, either as payments made by the landowners or by sale of the land as authorized in Section 51-33-83, shall constitute a trust fund in the hands of said receiver for the use and benefit of the bond and judgment holders entitled thereto. The receiver shall make report to court annually and from time to time as the court may order, showing the amount of assessments by him collected. Out of the funds so collected, the court shall order all costs paid. Ten per cent (10%) of the amount collected under said receivership shall, by said receiver, be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the department of audit fund; and the balance remaining shall be paid to the bond and judgment holders entitled thereto in proportion to their respective valid and legal holdings. When all assessed benefits become due and the receiver has collected all that can be collected, either by payment by the landowners or by sale of the land, he shall make final report; and upon paying out all funds in accordance with the orders of the court, the receiver may be finally discharged. Upon the discharge of said receiver, the status quo of the drainage district shall be reestablished by order of the court, or said district may be dissolved as by law permitted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4671-07; Laws, 1952, ch. 308, § 7.

§ 51-33-89.
Receivership as additional management method.

Sections 51-33-75 through 51-33-89 are not intended as repealing or modifying any statute of this state pertaining to drainage districts, but are intended as an additional and cumulative method of managing and operating drainage districts under special circumstances.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4671-08; Laws, 1952, ch. 308, § 8.

§ 51-33-91.
Dissolution of district without construction—time limitation for commencement of proceedings.

Any drainage district operating under the provisions of any law of the State of Mississippi which has no unmatured bonded indebtedness and has constructed no levees, canals, or other drainage improvements may be dissolved by the chancery court of the county in which said district was organized, or by the chancellor of such court in vacation, in the manner hereinafter provided; but the proceedings for its dissolution shall not be commenced within three years after the date of the organization of such district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4507; 1942, § 4733; Laws, 1924, ch. 256; Laws, 1934, ch. 229.

§ 51-33-93.
Dissolution of district without construction; petition; notice.

Whenever, after the expiration of the said period of three years, five or more landowners of any such district, or a majority of the landowners of any such district, excluding lands owned by the state, or any landowner or owners owning more than fifty per cent of the total acreage of said district, excluding the acreage owned by the state, shall sign and file with the clerk of the chancery court by which such district was organized, or in the county in which such district was organized, a petition for the dissolution of such drainage district, it shall be the duty of such clerk to give notice thereof by publishing said notice for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in said county, or in each of the counties in which lands of the district lie. Said notice shall be addressed to all persons interested in said drainage district and shall command them to appear before the said chancery court at a place named within the said chancery court district on a day certain in term time, or before the chancellor in vacation, not earlier than twenty days nor more than sixty days after the date of the first publication of said notice, and show cause, if any they can, why said drainage district should not be dissolved. Upon the first publication of said notice, all proceedings of every kind of said drainage district and of the commissioners of the said drainage district shall be discontinued until the hearing of said cause as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4508; 1942, § 4734; Laws, 1924, ch. 256; Laws, 1934, ch. 229.

§ 51-33-95.
Dissolution of district without construction; proceedings; chancery court jurisdiction.

The said chancery court, or the chancellor thereof in vacation, shall take jurisdiction of said cause and shall hear the same on the return day thereof in the same manner as other causes in chancery. If upon the hearing of said cause it appear that it is to the best interests of the landowners of said drainage district that said district be dissolved, the said court or chancellor shall thereupon enter an order dissolving the said drainage district, and requiring and decreeing that no further expenses or indebtedness be incurred or contracted by the commissioners of said drainage district. Said commissioners of said drainage district shall immediately and within ten days thereafter deposit with the clerk of the said court in which said proceedings are pending all papers, records, and documents of the said drainage district.

If it shall appear that it is not to the best interests of the landowners of the said district that the same be dissolved, the chancellor or chancery court shall so decree.

If it appear to the chancery court or chancellor that it is to the best interests of the said drainage district that same be dissolved and the decree is entered accordingly, the costs of the proceeding, including solicitors fees as might be allowed by the court, shall be assessed and taxed by the court to be collected on an acreage basis on the lands within said drainage district; and thereafter the said district shall be dissolved and shall have no further powers or authorities under the law whatsoever. In the event that the said district shall not be dissolved, such costs, attorneys fees, and expenses as may be involved shall be assessed against the petitioners; and the drainage district shall be absolved from any liability on account thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4509; 1942, § 4735; Laws, 1924, ch. 256; Laws, 1934, ch. 229.

§ 51-33-97.
Dissolution of district without construction; claims.

Nothing contained in Sections 51-33-91 through 51-33-97 shall be construed to impair or affect any contract or other obligation of any such drainage district, but persons holding claims against such drainage district shall, on notice of the dissolution thereof as provided herein, file any such claims as they may have against such district. If the court should decree that said district should be liquidated, all of said claims shall be passed upon by the chancery court or chancellor, as the case may be, and if found just, a levy shall be made upon said lands upon an acreage basis as hereinabove provided, in order to liquidate and pay such indebtedness as may be found due and owing by said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4510; 1942, § 4736; Laws, 1924, ch. 256; Laws, 1934, ch. 229.

§ 51-33-99.
Dissolution of district with construction not requiring maintenance.

Any drainage district heretofore organized which has constructed drainage canals and which has no outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, and wherein there is no necessity of maintenance work from year to year may be dissolved by the chancery court in which the drainage district was organized, or by the chancellor in vacation, in the manner hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4661; Laws, 1934, ch. 230.

§ 51-33-101.
Dissolution of district with construction not requiring maintenance; petition; notice.

Whenever a majority of the landowners owning a majority of the land in such drainage district shall sign and file with the clerk of the chancery court in which such drainage district was organized a petition for the dissolution of such drainage district, it shall be the duty of the chancery clerk to give notice thereof by publication. Such notice shall be published for three weeks in a newspaper published in the county in which the drainage district was organized, shall be addressed to all persons interested in said drainage district, and shall command them to appear before the said chancery court on a day certain in term time, or before the chancellor in vacation at a place and time to be stated in said notice, not later than five days nor more than sixty days after the date of the last publication of said notice and show cause, if any they can, why said drainage district should not be dissolved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4661; Laws, 1934, ch. 230.

§ 51-33-103.
Dissolution of district with construction not requiring maintenance; proceedings; chancery court jurisdiction.

The said chancery court, or the chancellor thereof in vacation, shall take jurisdiction of said cause and shall hear the same on the return day thereof in the same manner as other causes in chancery. If, upon the hearing of said cause, it shall appear that it is to the best interest of the landowners of said drainage district that said district be dissolved and that there is no outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, the court or chancellor shall thereupon enter an order dissolving the said district, requiring that no further expense or indebtedness be incurred or contracted by the commissioners of said drainage district, and that said drainage commissioners shall, within thirty days thereafter, deposit with the clerk of said court all papers and records of said district. If it shall not appear to be to the best interest of the landowners or if there is outstanding indebtedness against said drainage district and necessity for maintenance work from year to year in said district, the petition shall be dismissed at the cost of petitioners and no further petition for the dissolution of said district shall be filed within two years thereafter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4661; Laws, 1934, ch. 230.

§ 51-33-105.
Dissolution of district by cumulative method.

Whenever twenty-five per cent (25%) of the landowners owning a majority of the acreage of any drainage district organized under any of the laws of the State of Mississippi desire to have the same dissolved and its affairs wound up, the chancery court in which said district was organized, or the chancery court of the county in which the lands of said district are located, or the chancellor of either of said courts in vacation shall be authorized to enter an order or decree directing that the affairs of the same be wound up and that said districts be dissolved on such terms as the court or chancellor in vacation might deem meet and proper, (a) whenever it shall be made to appear to the court or chancellor in vacation in any proceeding filed for said purpose that said drainage district does not have any outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, or (b) in the event it does have an outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, but owns easements, rights of way, drains, canals, ditches, or other property which said district can sell for an amount equal to its fair cash market value which will be sufficient, or when added to any other funds of the district will be sufficient, to enable it to pay off and discharge all of its outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4662; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.

§ 51-33-107.
Dissolution of district by cumulative method; petition.

All proceedings instituted under Section 51-33-105 shall be by petition addressed to the court having jurisdiction of said proceedings, as aforesaid, and, when executed as hereinafter directed, filed with the clerk of said court. Said petition shall be signed by twenty-five per cent (25%) of the landowners owning a majority of the acreage in any of said drainage districts. Any guardian of the estate of any person under legal disability owning lands in said district is hereby authorized to sign said petition for said person or persons under disability and, likewise, the executors, administrators, or trustees of any decedent’s estate are authorized to sign said petition for said decedent. Any officer of any corporation may sign the same for said corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4663; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.

§ 51-33-109.
Dissolution of district by cumulative method; notice and summons.

After said petition has been filed with the clerk and if the same pray for a hearing in vacation, the clerk shall thereupon refer the same to the chancellor of said court with the request that he set the matter and fix the time, date, and place for the hearing thereof by him in vacation, and it shall be the duty of the chancellor to fix and set a time, date, and place for the hearing by him of said petition in vacation. When done, the clerk of said court shall cause a notice to be published which shall be addressed to all persons interested in the affairs of said drainage district and shall command them to appear at the time, date, and place set for the hearing of said petition to show cause, if any they can, why the prayer of said petition should not be granted. Said notice shall further command them to be present and file in said proceeding, on or before the time and date set for the hearing of said petition, any and all claims which they might have against said district, and that any and all claims not so presented and filed shall be forever barred, except the claims of holders of bonds or certificates of indebtedness legally issued by said district and the interest thereon. Said notice shall be published in a newspaper published in each of the counties in which the lands of the district lie for once in each week for three successive weeks, and said publication shall be deemed completed and said matters shall be deemed ready for hearing on their merits on the day fixed therefor in said order and the notice so published, provided not less than twenty-one days have intervened from the date of the first publication of said notice and the date fixed in said order and given in said notice published for said hearing.

After the time, date, and place has been set for the hearing of said petition as above provided, the clerk of said court shall issue a summons for each of the constituted authorities of said district, commanding them to appear before the court or chancellor in vacation at the time, date, and place so set for the hearing of said petition and to file in said proceeding, on or before the time and date set for the hearing thereof, a written statement under oath, showing in detail the full amount of bonds or certificates of indebtedness issued by said district, the amount paid, the amount outstanding, the amount of interest due thereon at the date of said hearing, as well as the amount of any other indebtedness of said district that is outstanding at the time.

If the petition as filed does not ask for said matters to be heard by the chancellor in vacation, the clerk shall cause notice to be given that all of the aforesaid matters will be heard on the first day of the next regular term of the said court to be convened after the filing of said petition, which said notice shall be published in the manner and for the length of time as hereinbefore specified.

The chancellor is hereby authorized to hear any and all of said matters in vacation at any place in his district that he might see fit so to do. On the hearing thereof he shall determine and adjudicate as to the sufficiency of said petition, shall determine and adjudicate from the evidence introduced in support thereof whether petitioners are entitled to relief prayed for, and shall likewise determine and adjudicate the amount of all outstanding indebtedness of said district, bonded or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4664; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.

§ 51-33-111.
Dissolution of district by cumulative method; claims.

At the time, date, and place set for the hearing of said petition as above provided, the court or chancellor in vacation shall at said time, date, and place also take up, examine, determine, and allow all claims of indebtedness of said district, bonded or otherwise. Any claims of indebtedness against any of said drainage districts which are not filed and presented with the clerk of the court in which said proceeding is pending on or before the time and date fixed therefor by the decree of the court or chancellor in vacation and in the notice so published shall be forever barred, except the claims of holders of bonds or of certificates of indebtedness legally issued by said district, and the interest thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4665; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.

§ 51-33-113.
Dissolution of district by cumulative method; sale of property; orders and decrees; appointment of masters.

In the event the petition as filed shows and the court or chancellor in vacation finds that said district has not paid off all of its outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, but owns easements, rights of way, canals, ditches, drains, or other property which can be sold for an amount equal to its fair cash market value which will enable said district to pay off and discharge its outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, the court or chancellor in vacation is in such event authorized, considering the best interests of the landowners and of said district, to enter an interlocutory order dissolving said district and directing its affairs to be wound up, which order shall be made final, either by the court in term time or by the chancellor in vacation, upon the property of said district being sold and all of its outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, being fully paid and discharged. To this end the court or chancellor in vacation is hereby authorized and empowered to make and enter all interlocutory decrees or orders that it might deem advisable and necessary to make; to divest the title out of said district in and to any and all easements, rights of way, canals, ditches, drains, or other property owned by said district and vest the same in a special commissioner to be appointed by the court or chancellor in vacation to sell the same on such terms and at such an amount as the court or chancellor in vacation finds to be for the best interest of the landowners and said district; and to direct said commissioner to convey any or all of said property to the purchaser at the price and on the terms authorized, to collect the same, and to pay therefrom any and all of the outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, as directed by the court or chancellor in vacation. The court or chancellor in vacation is hereby authorized to appoint masters or commissioners of the court to wind up the affairs of said district under its direction, and to make any and all interlocutory orders that might be necessary to be made for the purpose of dissolving said district and directing its affairs to be wound up.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4666; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.

§ 51-33-115.
Dissolution of district by cumulative method; claims; fees and commissions; contraction of debts.

The court or chancellor in vacation is hereby authorized at the time, date, and place of the first hearing of all of the aforesaid matters, as well as at any other time he might order, to allow and determine all claims of indebtedness of said district, bonded or otherwise, and to provide for the payment of all of such indebtedness, including all bonded indebtedness which at that time remains unpaid. The court or chancellor in vacation is hereby authorized to allow reasonable fees and commissions to commissioners or liquidators, covering service rendered by them, who might be appointed by him to wind up the affairs of any of said drainage districts; to allow reasonable attorney’s fees to the attorney or attorneys for any services rendered by him or them in bringing about the dissolution of said district and having its affairs wound up; and to provide for the payment of all of said fees and commissions. After said petition has been filed as herein authorized, no further debts shall be contracted or incurred by said district except such as may be allowed by the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4667; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.

§ 51-33-117.
Dissolution of district by cumulative method; surplus funds; effect of dissolution.

If it shall be made to appear to the court or chancellor in vacation on the hearing of any proceedings filed under Sections 51-33-105 through 51-33-121 that the district will have funds on hand after all of its debts and all expenses and court costs incident to said proceeding have been paid, then and in this event, the court or chancellor in vacation shall provide, order, and direct in the final decree dissolving said district that the said surplus shall be refunded among the landowners of said district on such pro rata, equitable, and just basis and terms as the court or chancellor shall find to be proper. After the final decree has been rendered by the court or chancellor in vacation in any proceeding instituted under said sections dissolving any drainage district, said district shall have no further existence and no further drainage taxes shall be levied against any of the lands embraced within the limits of said district. All of the unpaid benefits and assessments assessed against the lands in said drainage district for drainage purposes shall stand canceled, the lien therefor shall be unenforceable, and the court or chancellor in vacation shall so provide in the final decree rendered dissolving said drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4668; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.

§ 51-33-119.
Dissolution of district by cumulative method; appeals.

The hearing and trial of any proceeding instituted under the terms of Sections 51-33-105 through 51-33-121 shall be conducted as other hearings and trials are conducted in the chancery court or by the chancellor in vacation, except as hereinabove provided. Any person feeling aggrieved by a final decree rendered by the court or chancellor in vacation in any of said proceedings shall have a right to appeal therefrom to the supreme court of Mississippi, which appeal shall be taken within twenty days from the date of said final decree.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4669; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.